Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.468

Raising the minimum legal age of sale in certain compacts—Consultations with federally recognized Indian tribes—Report to legislature.

In recognition of the sovereign authority of tribal governments, the governor may seek government-to-government consultations with federally recognized Indian tribes regarding raising the minimum legal age of sale in compacts entered into pursuant to RCW 43.06.455, 43.06.465, 43.06.466, and 43.06.505 through 43.06.515. The office of the governor shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the status of such consultations no later than December 1, 2020.

[ 2019 c 445 s 307; 2019 c 15 s 11.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2019 c 445 s 307 takes effect October 1, 2019; however, this session law amended 2019 c 15 s 11, which takes effect January 1, 2020.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 445: See RCW 82.25.900 and 82.25.901.

Automatic expiration date and tax preference performance statement exemption—2019 c 445: See note following RCW 82.08.0318.

Effective date—2019 c 15: See note following RCW 26.28.080.